Hawaii statutes.
§325-53 Reports of blood tests. In
reporting a birth or fetal death, every physician or other person required to
make such reports shall state, in a report accompanying the certificate,
whether, according to the physician's or other person's knowledge or
information, a blood test for syphilis has been made upon a specimen of blood
taken from the woman who bore the child for which the birth or stillbirth
certificate is filed and the approximate date when the specimen was taken. The
department of health may investigate the circumstances surrounding the birth of
any baby on whose mother no serologic test, as required by this part, appears
to have been taken. Failure on the part of any physician or other person
permitted by law to attend pregnant women to comply with this part may be
punished by an administrative fine in an amount not to exceed $1,000 per
violation, to be assessed by the director of health. The director of health is
authorized to impose the penalty pursuant to this section. [L 1943, c 219, §3;
RL 1945, §2312; RL 1955, §49-52; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §325-53; gen ch
1985; am L 1988, c 158, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next